Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-617.10
Delayed birth certificate; hearing; notice; witnesses.

The court shall fix a time and place for a hearing upon a petition filed under section 71-617.08 and shall give the department ten calendar days' notice of such hearing. Authorized representatives of the department may appear and testify in the proceeding.

Laws 1985, LB 42, § 17;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 534;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 149;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 424.